Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 7. Benefits.
Sec. 39.35.522.
Waiver of adjustments.

Upon request by an affected member or beneficiary under (b) of this section, the commissioner of administration may waive an adjustment or any portion of an adjustment made under AS

39.35.520

if, in the opinion of the commissioner of administration,

the adjustment or portion of the adjustment will cause undue hardship to the member or beneficiary;

the adjustment was not the result of erroneous information supplied by the member or beneficiary;

before the adjustment was made, the member or beneficiary received confirmation from the administrator that the employee’s or beneficiary’s records were correct; and

the member or beneficiary had no reasonable grounds to believe the employee’s or beneficiary’s records were incorrect before the adjustment was made.

In order to obtain consideration of a waiver under this section, the affected member or beneficiary must appeal to the commissioner of administration in writing within 30 days after receipt of notice that the records have been adjusted.

[Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

A decision of the commissioner of administration under this section to deny a waiver under this section may be appealed to the office of administrative hearings. The office of administrative hearings may reverse the decision of the commissioner and may impose conditions on the granting of a waiver which it considers equitable. These conditions may include requiring the member or beneficiary to make additional contributions to the plan.

[Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 57 ch 68 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 57 ch 68 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 174 SLA 1978; am § 41 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 60 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 46 — 48, 57 ch 68 SLA 2000; am §§ 115, 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 70 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, in subsection (e), “AS 39.35.047(c)” was substituted for “AS 39.35.077(c)” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 39.35.077.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.
Also, in 2005, in complying with the instruction in § 144(d), ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, to change “board” to “commissioner” in (b) and (d) of this section, the words “of administration” were added to maintain consistency with the amendment of (a) of this section by § 115, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Sec. 39.35.525.
Limitation on use of credited service as peace officer or fireman. [Repealed, § 37 ch 106 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 39.35.527.
Election to terminate coverage as a peace officer or firefighter.

Any active member may elect to irrevocably relinquish peace officer or firefighter status with the plan and to retain all credited service as if it had been acquired as a member other than a peace officer or firefighter.

In order to relinquish peace officer or firefighter status with the plan, a person must be an active member and must file a written request with the administrator by July 1, 1984, or within six months after employment as a peace officer or firefighter, whichever occurs later. No person has more than one opportunity to exercise this option.

As soon as possible after the relinquishment, the administrator shall refund to a person who relinquishes peace officer or firefighter status under this section a refund equal to the amount by which the balance of the person’s accumulated mandatory contributions plus interest exceeds the balance which would exist if all service credit had been acquired as a member other than a peace officer or firefighter.

A written request to relinquish peace officer or firefighter status is irrevocable upon filing with the administrator.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “fire fighter” was substituted for “fireman” in this section under § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.530.
Limit on pension.

An employee may not simultaneously receive a pension under more than one section of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

. However, benefits under AS

39.35.420(b)

,

39.35.430

,

39.35.440

or

39.35.450

shall be paid in addition to the benefits or service credit a person is entitled to receive because of the person’s own membership in the retirement plan.
An employee may not (1) receive duplicate credit under this plan for the same period of service, (2) receive more than one year of service credit in the course of any calendar year, or (3) receive a benefit while accruing service credit under this plan, except as provided in this section.

History.

(§ 42 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 61 ch 137 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.535.
Medical benefits.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, the following persons are entitled to major medical insurance coverage under this section:

for employees first hired before July 1, 1986,

an employee who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage;

the spouse and dependent children of the employee described in (A) of this paragraph;

the surviving spouse of a deceased employee who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage;

the dependent children of a deceased employee who are dependent on the surviving spouse described in (C) of this paragraph;

for members first hired on or after July 1, 1986,

an employee who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage for the employee;

the spouse of the employee described in (A) of this paragraph if the employee elected coverage for the spouse;

the dependent children of the employee described in (A) of this paragraph if the employee elected coverage for the dependent children;

the surviving spouse of a deceased employee who is receiving a monthly benefit from the plan and who has elected coverage;

the dependent children of a deceased employee who are dependent on the surviving spouse described in (D) of this paragraph if the surviving spouse has elected coverage for the dependent children.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, after an election of coverage under this section, major medical insurance coverage takes effect on the same date that benefits begin, and stops when the member or survivor is no longer eligible to receive a monthly benefit. The coverage for persons age 65 or older is the same coverage available for a person under 65 years of age. The benefits payable to persons age 65 or older supplement any benefits provided under the federal old age, survivors and disability insurance program. The medical premium and optional insurance premiums owed by a member or survivor shall be deducted from the benefit owed to the member or survivor before payment of the benefit.

A benefit recipient may elect major medical insurance coverage in accordance with regulations and under the following conditions:

a person, other than a disabled member or a disabled member who is appointed to normal retirement, must pay an amount equal to the full monthly group premium for retiree major medical insurance coverage if the person is

younger than 60 years of age and has less than

25 years of credited service as a peace officer under AS

39.35.360

and

39.35.370

; or

30 years of credited service under AS

39.35.360

and

39.35.370

that is not service as a peace officer; or

of any age and has less than 10 years of credited service;

a person is not required to make premium payments for retiree major medical coverage if the person

is a disabled member;

is a disabled member who is appointed to normal retirement;

is 60 years of age or older and has at least 10 years of credited service; or

has at least

25 years of credited service as a peace officer under AS 39.35.360 and 39.35.370; or

30 years of credited service under AS 39.35.360 and 39.35.370 not as a peace officer.

Receipt under a qualified domestic relations order of a monthly benefit from the plan does not entitle a person or the person’s spouse or child to insurance coverage under (a) of this section. However, a member’s former spouse who receives a monthly benefit under a qualified domestic relations order is entitled to receive major medical insurance coverage if the former spouse

elects the coverage within 60 days after the first monthly benefit paid under the order is mailed first class or otherwise delivered; and

pays the premium established by the administrator for the coverage.

The administrator shall inform members who have requested appointment to retirement that the health insurance coverage available to retired members may be different from the health insurance coverage provided to employees. The administrator shall also notify those members of time limits for selecting optional health insurance coverage and whether the election is irrevocable. A member who has requested appointment to retirement shall indicate in writing on a form provided by the administrator that the member has received the information required by this subsection and whether the member has chosen to receive optional health insurance coverage.

On and after July 1, 2007, benefits under this section shall be provided in part by the Alaska retiree health care trust established under AS

39.30.097(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 200 SLA 1975; am § 62 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 44, 45 ch 82 SLA 1986; am §§ 48, 49 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 14 SLA 1992; am § 17 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 49 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 10 ch 57 SLA 2001; am § 116 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 71 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (c).
Renumbered in 1986.
Minor word changes were made in 1986 to reconcile amendments to the section made by chapters 82 and 117, SLA 1986.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For major medical insurance, see 2 AAC 39, art. 3.

For appeals from denials of medical claims under the medical coverage provided by the teachers’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 39, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Provisions relating to federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance benefits may be found in 42 U.S.C. 301 — 1397f (Social Security Act).

Section 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 provides:
“Sections 16, 22-23, 25-27, 42-45, and 50 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986.”

Section 44, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that nothing in that Act, which amended subsection (c), “modifies or terminates the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 1996.” Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that Act, which amended subsection (c), are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 39.35.540.
Minimum benefit. [Repealed, § 75 ch 137 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 39.35.541.
Actuarial reduction of benefit.

If, as a result of service credit claimed for which there is a corresponding indebtedness existing at retirement, the member’s retirement benefit is actuarially reduced and the resultant benefit is less than it would have been if the service credit had not been claimed, the retirement benefit shall be equal to the amount it would have been had the service credit not been claimed.

This section does not apply to an election to use service credit and a corresponding indebtedness under AS

39.35.340(i)

.

History.

(§ 63 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 81 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 11, 2014, added (b).

Sec. 39.35.545.
Duplicate benefits. [Repealed, § 6 ch 81 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 39.35.546.
State and federal taxation of benefits.

Benefits of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

are exempt from Alaska state and municipal income taxes.

Benefits paid under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

may be subject to federal income taxes as provided in 26 U.S.C. 72.

History.

(§ 17 ch 109 SLA 1970; am § 50 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 42 ch 59 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.547.
Effect of amendments.

An amendment of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

is not retroactive unless its retroactivity is expressly stated in the amendment.

The monthly amount of a benefit payable under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

in effect on the date of termination of the member’s last segment of employment.

History.

(§ 5 ch 81 SLA 1976; am § 42 ch 13 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Cross references. —

For general provision that no statute is retroactive unless expressly stated, see AS

01.10.090

.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of a particular statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.